District of Columbia statutes.
29-502

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“License” means license, certification, certificate, or registration, or other legal authorization required by law as a condition precedent to the rendering of professional service within the District.

(2)

“Professional corporation” means a corporation organized under this chapter solely for the specific purposes provided under this chapter and which has, as its shareholders, only individuals who themselves are duly licensed to render the same professional service as the corporation.

(3)

“Professional service” means any type of personal service to the public which may be lawfully rendered only pursuant to a license and which by law, custom, standards of professional conduct or practice in the District before December 10, 1971, could not be rendered by a corporation, including the services performed by certified public accountants, attorneys, architects, health professionals as defined in section 101(8) of the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01(8)), and professional engineers.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(e)(1), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “health professionals as defined in section 101(8) of the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01(8))” for “practitioners of the healing arts, dentists, optometrists, podiatrists” in (3).

Former § 29-502 has been recodified as § 36-502.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.